Massachusetts, session 194th, S816.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 48(c) of chapter 23G of the General Laws, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the words “women-owned contractors” the following:- worker-owned
contractors
SECTION 2. Section 48(d) of chapter 23G of the General Laws, is hereby amended by
inserting after the words “and minority-owned” the following:- worker-owned,
SECTION 3. Section 48(i) of chapter 23G of the General Laws, is hereby amended by
inserting after the word “minority-” the following:- worker-,
of 1